Washington statutes.
RCW 42.45.240

Validity of notarial acts.

Except as otherwise provided in RCW 42.45.020(2), the failure of a notarial officer to perform a duty or meet a requirement specified in this chapter does not invalidate a notarial act performed by the notarial officer. The validity of a notarial act under this chapter does not prevent an aggrieved person from seeking to invalidate the record or transaction that is the subject of the notarial act or from seeking other remedies based on law of this state other than this chapter or law of the United States. This section does not validate a purported notarial act performed by an individual who does not have the authority to perform notarial acts. Nothing in chapter 281, Laws of 2017 gives the director authority to invalidate a notarial act.

[ 2017 c 281 s 26.]